Missouri, session 2026, HB2865.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.085, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 536.085, to read as follows:
536.085. As used in section 536.087, the following terms mean:
(1) "Agency proceeding", an adversary proceeding in a contested case pursuant to this
chapter in which the state is represented by counsel, but does not include proceedings for
determining the eligibility or entitlement of an individual to a monetary benefit or its
equivalent, child custody proceedings, eminent domain proceedings, driver's license
proceedings, vehicle registration proceedings, proceedings to establish or fix a rate, or
proceedings before the state tax commission;
(2) "Party":
(a) An individual whose net worth did not exceed two million dollars at the time the
civil action or agency proceeding was initiated; or
(b) Any owner of an unincorporated business or any partnership, corporation,
association, unit of local government or organization, the net worth of which did not exceed
seven million dollars at the time the civil action or agency proceeding was initiated, and
which had not more than five hundred employees at the time the civil action or agency
proceeding was initiated;
(3) "Prevails", obtains a favorable order, decision, judgment, or dismissal in a civil
action or agency proceeding;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2865 2
(4) "Reasonable fees and expenses" includes the reasonable expenses of expert
witnesses, the reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test, or project which
is found by the court or agency to be necessary for the preparation of the party's case, and
reasonable attorney or agent fees. The amount of fees awarded as reasonable fees and
expenses shall be based upon prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of the services
furnished, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest
rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state in the type of civil action or
agency proceeding[, and attorney fees shall not be awarded in excess of seventy-five dollars
per hour unless the court determines that a special factor, such as the limited availability of
qualified attorneys for the proceedings involved, justifies a higher fee];
(5) "State", the state of Missouri, its officers and its agencies, but shall not include
political subdivisions of the state.
✔